nl: tarwe- of tapiocadextrose
fi: vehnä- tai tapiokadekstroosi
sv: dextros av vete eller tapioka

fr: dextrose de tapioca
fi: tapiokadekstroosi
nl: tapiocadextrose

en: agave syrup, agave nectar
ar: شراب أغاف
bg: сироп от агаве
ca: xarop d'atzavara, xarop d'agave
cs: agávovy sirup
da: agavesirup
de: Agavensirup
es: jarabe de agave, sirope de agave
fa: اگاو
fi: agavesiirappi, agave siirappi
fr: sirop d’agave
hr: sirup od agave, agavin sirup
hu: agaveszirup
id: Agave nectar
is: agave-síróp
it: sciroppo d'agave
lv: agaves sīrups
nl: agavesiroop
pl: syrop z agawy
pt: Xarope de Agave
ru: Сироп агавы, сироп из агавы
sl: agavin sirup
sv: agavesirap
zh: 龍舌蘭糖漿

en: organic agave syrup
bg: био сироп от агаве
de: Bio-Agavensirup
es: Sirope de agave orgánico, jarabe de agave orgánico
fi: luomu agavesiirappi
fr: sirop d'agave issu de l'agriculture biologique, sirop d'agave concentre issu de l'agriculture biologique, sirop d'agave biologique
hr: organski agavin sirup
hu: bio agaveszirup
it: sciroppo d'agave biologico
nl: biologische agave

en: concentrated agave syrup
de: Agavendicksaft
es: concentrado de agave
fr: jus d'agave concentré
hr: koncentriranog agavinog sirupa
it: succo di agave concentrato
pl: koncentrat syropu z agawy

en: organic concentrated agave syrup
es: jarabe de ágave concentrado ecológico, sirope de ágave concentrado ecológico
fr: sirop d'agave concentré biologique
hr: organski koncentrirani sirup od agave
it: sciroppo di agave concentrato biologico

en: agave fiber
de: Agavenfaser, Agavenfasern
fr: fibres d'agave
hr: vlakna agave
it: fibre d'agave, fibra d'agave, fibra di agave, fibre di agave
nl: agavevezel

en: oligosaccharides
de: Oligosaccharide
es: oligosacáridos
hr: oligosaharidi
it: oligosaccaridi
ja: オリゴ糖

en: isomalto-oligosaccharide, isomaltooligosaccharide
bg: изомалто-олигозахарид
cs: isomalto-oligosacharidy
de: isomalto-oligosaccharid
fi: isomalto-oligosakkaridi, isomalto-oligosakkaridit
fr: isomalto-oligosaccharide
hr: izomalto-oligosaharid
pt: isomalto-oligossacandeos
sv: isomalto-oligosackarider
zh: 低聚异麦芽糖

en: Fructooligosaccharide, fructo-oligosaccharide, Fructooligosaccharid
xx: FOS
ar: قليل السكاريد الفركتوزي
bg: Фруктоолигозахарид
ca: Fructooligosacàrid
de: Fructooligosaccharid, Fructooligosaccharide
el: Φρουκτοολιγοσακχαρίτες
es: Fructooligosacárido, Fructoligosacáridos
et: Frukto-oligosahhariidid, Fruktooligosahhariidid
eu: Fruktooligosakarido
fi: frukto-oligosakkaridi
fr: fructooligosaccharides, Fructo-oligosaccharide
hr: fruktooligosaharid
hu: frukto-oligoszacharid
it: Frutto-oligosaccaridi
ja: フラクトオリゴ糖
nl: fructo-oligosachariden
pl: fruktooligosacharydy
pt: Frutooligossacarídeo
sh: Fruktooligosaharid
sr: Fruktooligosaharid
th: ฟรุคโตโอลิโกแซคคาร์ไรด์
zh: 果寡糖

en: mannan oligosaccharides
xx: MOS
da: mannan oligosaccharider
de: Mannan-Oligosaccharid
el: Ολιγοσακχαρίτες mannan
et: Mannano oligosahhariidid
it: Mannano oligo saccaridi

en: monk fruit extract
de: Mönchsfruchtextrakt
it: estratto di frutto del monaco
nb: balsampæreekstrakt
sv: luo han guo-extrakt, munkfruktextrakt

en: protein, proteins
af: Proteïen
an: Proteína
ar: البروتين
as: মাংসসাৰ
az: Zülallar
ba: Аҡһымдар
be: Бялкі
bg: Белтък, Белтъци, Белтъчини
bn: প্রোটিন
br: protein
bs: Bjelančevine
ca: proteïna
cs: Bílkoviny
cv: Шуррисем
cy: protein
da: protein, proteiner
de: Protein, Eiweiß, Eiweißstoff, Eiweiss
dv: ޕްރޮޓީން
el: Πρωτεΐνη
eo: proteino
es: proteína, proteínas
et: valk, valgud, proteiinid
eu: proteina
fa: پروتئین
fi: Proteiini
fo: Protein
fr: protéine, proteine, Protéine brute
fy: Aaiwyt
ga: Próitéin
gv: Proteen
he: חלבונים
hi: प्रोटीन
hr: bjelančevine
ht: pwoteyin
hu: fehérje, protein
hy: Սպիտակուցներ
ia: proteina
id: Protein
io: proteino
is: Prótín, prótein
it: proteine, protidi
ja: たんぱく質
jv: Protéin
ka: ცილები
kk: Ақуыз
kn: ಪ್ರೋಟೀನ್
ko: 단백질
ku: Proteîn
ky: Белок
la: Proteinum
lb: Protein, Eewäiss
lo: ປະໂລເຕອິນ
lt: Baltymai
lv: Olbaltumvielas
mk: Белковина
ml: മാംസ്യം
mn: Уураг
mr: प्रथिने
ms: Protein
mt: Proteini
my: ပရိုတိန်း
nb: protein, proteiner
ne: प्रोटिन
nl: eiwitten, proteïnen, eiwit
nn: protein
oc: proteïna
om: Pirootiinii
or: ପୁଷ୍ଟିସାର
pa: ਪ੍ਰੋਟੀਨ
pl: Białko
pt: proteína, proteínas
qu: prutina
ro: Proteine
ru: Белки
sh: Protein
si: ප්‍රෝටීන්
sk: Bielkoviny
sl: Beljakovine
so: Borotiin
sq: Proteina
sr: Протеин, Proteini
su: Protéin
sv: protein, proteiner
sw: Protini
ta: புரதம்
te: మాంసకృత్తులు
tg: Протеинҳо дар реҷаи ғизо
th: โปรตีน
tl: Protina
tr: Protein
tt: Аксым
uk: Білки
ur: پروٹین
uz: Proteinlar
wa: Proteyene
yi: פראטעאין
zh: 蛋白质

en: hydrolysed protein, hydrolysed proteins
da: hydrolyseret protein, hydrolyserede proteiner
de: Proteinhydrolysat, Eiweißhydrolysat
es: proteína hidrolizada
fi: proteiinihydrosylaatit, proteiinihydrosylaatti
fr: protéine hydrolysée
hr: hidrolizirani proteini
hu: hidrolizált fehérjék, hidolizált fehérje
it: Proteine idrolizzate
nl: gehydroliseerd eiwit, gehydrolyseerd eiwit, eiwithydrolysaat
pl: hydrolizat białka
sv: proteinhydrolysat

en: yeast protein
cs: kvasnicová bílkovina
fi: hiivaproteiini
fr: protéine de levure
hr: bjelančevine kvasca
it: proteina di lievito

en: plant protein, vegetable protein, vegetal protein
bg: растителен протеин, растителни протеини
ca: Proteïna vegetal
cs: rostlinné proteiny, rostlinné bílkoviny
da: vegetabilsk protein
de: pflanzliches Eiweiß, Pflanzenprotein, Pflanzenproteine, Pflanzliche Protein, pflanzliche Eiweißextrakte, pflanzliches Eiweiss
es: proteína vegetal
fi: kasviproteiini
fr: protéines végétales, protéine végétale
hr: biljni proteini, biljne bjelančevine
hu: növényi fehérje, növényi fehérjék
it: proteine vegetali
ja: 植物性蛋白, 植物性たん白
lv: augu proteīns
nb: vegetabilsk protein
nl: plantaardige eiwit, plantaardig eiwit
pl: białko roślinne, białka roślinnego
pt: Proteína vegetal
ru: растительный белок
sv: grönsaksprotein

en: rehydrated plant protein
fr: protéines végétales réhydratées
hu: rehidratált növényi fehérjék
nl: gehydrolyseerde plantaardige eiwitten, plantaardig eiwithydrolysaat

en: textured plant protein
de: texturiertes Pflanzenprotein
it: proteine vegetali testurizzate

en: almond protein
da: mandelprotein
de: Mandelprotein
fr: protéine d'amande
it: proteine delle mandorle, proteine dalle mandorle, proteine (mandorle), proteina (mandorle)
nb: mandelprotein
nn: mandelprotein
pl: białko migdałowe, białko z migdałów
sv: mandelprotein

en: mung bean protein
sv: protein från mungböna, protein från mungbönor